Vermont statutes. Title 15A Adoption Act
Subchapter 2. Preplacement Evaluation

§ 2-201.
Preplacement evaluation required.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, only a person for whom a favorable written preplacement evaluation has been prepared may accept custody of a minor for purposes of adoption.

An evaluation is valid if it was completed or updated within the 12 months preceding the placement of the minor with the person for adoption.

A court may waive all or a portion of the requirement of a preplacement evaluation for good cause shown, but a person who is the subject of a waiver shall be evaluated during the pendency of a proceeding for adoption.

A preplacement evaluation is not required if a parent or guardian places a minor directly with a relative of the minor for purposes of adoption, but an evaluation of the relative is required during the pendency of a proceeding for adoption.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1997, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2-202.
Preplacement evaluator.

A preplacement evaluation may be prepared only by a person who is qualified by the Department to make the evaluation or who meets the qualifications of an evaluator and is appointed by the court.

An evaluator may charge a reasonable fee, based on time spent, for preparing an evaluation, even if the person being evaluated requests that it not be completed.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2-203.
Timing and content of preplacement evaluation.

A person requesting a preplacement evaluation need not have located a prospective minor adoptee when the request is made, and the person may request more than one evaluation.

A preplacement evaluation shall be completed within 90 days after it is requested unless extended by the court. An evaluator shall give priority to a request from a person who has located a prospective adoptee.

A preplacement evaluation shall be based upon a personal interview and visit at the residence of the person being evaluated, personal interviews or correspondence with others who know the person and may have information relevant to the evaluation, and the information required by subsection (d) of this section.

A preplacement evaluation shall contain the following information about the person being evaluated:

age and date of birth, nationality, racial or ethnic background, and any religious affiliation;

marital status and family history, including the age and location of any child of the person and the identity of and relationship to anyone else living in the person’s household;

parenting experience;

physical and mental health, and any history of abuse of alcohol or drugs;

educational and employment history and any special skills;

property and income, including outstanding financial obligations as indicated in a current credit report or financial statement furnished by the person;

any previous request for an evaluation or involvement in an adoptive placement and the outcome of the evaluation or placement as confirmed by the Department;

whether the person has been subject to an abuse prevention order issued under

15 V.S.A. § 1103

or 1104; charged with or convicted of domestic assault in violation of

13 V.S.A. § 1042

(domestic assault), 1043 (first-degree aggravated domestic assault), or 1044 (second-degree aggravated domestic assault); or the subject of a substantiated complaint filed with the Department; or subject to a court order restricting the person’s right to parental rights and responsibilities or parent-child contact with a child;

whether the person has been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation;

whether the person has located a parent interested in placing a minor with the person for adoption and, if so, a brief description of the parent and the minor;

reason for and attitude about adoption;

whether the person is in noncompliance with a child support order; and

any other fact or circumstance that may be relevant in determining whether the person is suited to be an adoptive parent, including the quality of the environment in the home and the functioning of other children in the person’s household.

A person being evaluated shall submit to fingerprinting and sign a release permitting the evaluator to obtain from an appropriate law enforcement agency any record indicating that the person has been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation.

A person being evaluated shall, at the request of the evaluator, sign any release necessary for the evaluator to obtain information required by subsection (d) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 53

, § 2, eff. June 26, 1997.

§ 2-204.
Determining suitability to be adoptive parent.

An evaluator shall assess the information required by section 2-203 of this title to determine whether it raises a concern that placement of any minor, or a particular minor, in the home of the person would pose a risk of harm to the physical or psychological well-being of the minor.

If an evaluator determines that the information assessed does not raise a concern that placement of any minor, or a particular minor, in the home of the person would pose a risk of harm to the physical or psychological well-being of the minor, the evaluator shall find that the person is suited to be an adoptive parent. The evaluator may comment about any factor that in the evaluator’s opinion makes the person suited in general or for a particular minor.

If an evaluator determines that the information assessed raises a concern that placement of any minor, or a particular minor, in the home of the person would pose a risk of harm to the physical or psychological well-being of the minor, the evaluator, on the basis of the original or any further investigation, shall find that the person is or is not suited to be an adoptive parent. The evaluator shall support the finding with a written explanation.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2-205.
Filing and copies of preplacement evaluation.

If a preplacement evaluation contains a finding that a person is suited to be an adoptive parent, the evaluator shall give the person a signed copy of the evaluation. At the person’s request, the evaluator shall furnish a copy of the evaluation to a person authorized under this title to place a minor for adoption and, unless the person requests otherwise, edit the copy to exclude identifying information.

If a preplacement evaluation contains a finding that a person is not suited to be an adoptive parent of any minor, or a particular minor, the evaluator shall immediately give a signed copy of the evaluation to the person and to the Department. The Department shall retain for 10 years the copy and a copy of any court order concerning the evaluation issued pursuant to section 2-206 or 2-207 of this title.

An evaluator shall retain for two years the original of a completed or incomplete preplacement evaluation and a list of every source for each item of information in the evaluation.

An evaluator who conducted an evaluation in good faith under this part or under Part 6 of Article 3 of this title is not subject to civil liability for anything contained in the evaluation.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2-206.
Review of evaluation.

Within 90 days after a person receives a preplacement evaluation with a finding that he or she is not suited to be an adoptive parent, the person may petition the Probate Division of the Superior Court for review of the evaluation.

If the court determines that the petitioner has failed to prove suitability by a preponderance of the evidence, it shall order that the petitioner not be permitted to adopt a minor and shall send a copy of the order to the Department to be retained with the copy of the original evaluation. If, at the time of the court’s determination, the petitioner has custody of a minor for purposes of adoption, the court shall make an appropriate order for the care and custody of the minor.

If the court determines that the petitioner has proved suitability, the court shall find the petitioner suitable to be an adoptive parent and the petitioner may commence or continue a proceeding for adoption of a minor. The court shall send a copy of its order to the Department to be retained with the copy of the original evaluation.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2-207.
Action by Department.

If, before a decree of adoption is issued, the Department learns from an evaluator or another person that a minor has been placed for adoption with a person who is the subject of a preplacement evaluation on file with the Department containing a finding of unsuitability, the Department shall immediately review the evaluation and investigate the circumstances of the placement and may request that the person return the minor to the custody of the person who placed the minor or to the Department. If the person refuses to return the minor, the Department shall immediately commence an action or proceeding to remove the minor from the home of the person and, pending a hearing, the court shall make an appropriate order for the care and custody of the minor.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.